Utah statutes.
54-8b-1.1.   Legislative policy declarations.

The Legislature declares it is the policy of the state to:

(1)  endeavor to achieve the universal service objectives of the state as set forth in Section 54-8b-11;

(2)  facilitate access to high quality, affordable public telecommunications services to all residents and businesses in the state;

(3)  encourage the development of competition as a means of providing wider customer choices for public telecommunications services throughout the state;

(4)  allow flexible and reduced regulation for telecommunications corporations and public telecommunications services as competition develops;

(5)  facilitate and promote the efficient development and deployment of an advanced telecommunications infrastructure, including networks with nondiscriminatory prices, terms, and conditions of interconnection;

(6)  encourage competition by facilitating the sale of essential telecommunications facilities and services on a reasonably unbundled basis;

(7)  seek to prevent prices for tariffed public telecommunications services or price-regulated services from subsidizing the competitive activities of regulated telecommunications corporations;

(8)  encourage new technologies and modify regulatory policy to allow greater competition in the telecommunications industry;

(9)  enhance the general welfare and encourage the growth of the economy of the state through increased competition in the telecommunications industry; and

(10)  endeavor to protect customers who do not have competitive choice.



Enacted by Chapter 269, 1995 General Session

